"I should like now to express our thanks and appreciation to Dr. Corwin and to his collaborators from the Service, Dr. Norman J."
"It is the conception which underlies congressional legislation of recent years making certain crimes against the States, like theft, racketeering, kidnapping, crimes also against the National Government whenever the offender extends his activities beyond state boundary lines."
"[33] The Youngstown Opinion appears to rest on the proposition that since Congress could have ordered the seizure, e.g., under the necessary and proper clause, the President, in making it on his own, usurped legislative power and thereby violated the principle of the Separation of Powers."
"Indeed, were it otherwise, the action of the Court in disallowing President Truman's seizure order would have been of very questionable validity, inasmuch as the President himself conceded that Congress could do so."
"As early as 1831 we find an Attorney-General arguing before the Supreme Court that, in performance of the trust enjoined upon him by the faithful execution clause, the President not only may, but ... is bound to avail himself of every appropriate means not forbidden by law."
"Here in so many words the President lays claim to the war power, partly on the ground of his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed, partly in reliance on his powers as Commander-in-Chief, incidentally furnishing thereby a formula which has frequently reappeared in opinions of Attorneys-General in recent years."
"[53] In his book, _Our Chief Magistrate and his Powers_, Ex-President Taft warmly protested against the notion that the President has any constitutional warrant to attempt the role of a Universal Providence."
"[54] A decade earlier his destined successor, Woodrow Wilson, had avowed the opinion that the President is at liberty, both in law and conscience, to be as big a man as he can."
"Substantially contemporaneously a well read French critic described our system as _Le Gouvernment des Juges_ (1921); while toward the end of the period Louis B. Boudin published his well known _Government by Judiciary_ (2 vols., 1932)."
"The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, which shall neither be encreased nor diminished during the Period for which he shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other Emolument from the United States, or any of them."
"In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime shall have been committed, which district shall have been previously ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of Counsel for his defence."
"If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President or Vice President shall have qualified."
"It, therefore, follows that the date on which the governor approved the ratification, or the date on which the secretary of state of a given State certified the ratification, or the date on which the Secretary of State of the United States received a copy of said certificate, or the date on which he proclaimed that the amendment had been ratified are not controlling."
"[68] MODIFICATION OF TARIFF LAWS This point was raised again in Field _v._ Clark,[69] where the Tariff Act of 1890 was assailed as unconstitutional because it directed the President to suspend the free importation of enumerated commodities for such time as he shall deem just if he found that other countries imposed upon agricultural or other products of the United States duties or other exactions which he may deem to be reciprocally unequal and unjust."
Nor did it require him to make any findings of fact to disclose the basis of his action.
Many of the provisions thus activated delegate powers of greater or less importance to the President himself or remove statutory restrictions thereon.
"[130] In exercising the power granted by section 5 to judge the qualifications of its own members, each House has asserted the power to inquire into the conduct of a member-elect prior to his election."
"In 1900 the House of Representatives refused to seat a person who practiced polygamy,[131] and in 1928 the Senate voted to exclude a Senator-elect on the ground that his acceptance of large campaign contributions from persons who were subject to regulation by a State Administrative Commission of which he had been Chairman were contrary to sound public policy and tainted his credentials with fraud and corruption."
[154] It may punish a State election officer for violating his duty under a State law governing Congressional elections.
"In the exercise of its discretion, it may issue a warrant for the arrest of a witness to procure his testimony, without previous subpoena, if there is good reason to believe that otherwise such witness would not be forthcoming."
"In United States _v._ Smith,[170] the Court held that the Senate's attempt to reconsider its confirmation of a person nominated by the President as Chairman of the Federal Power Commission was not warranted by its rules, and did not deprive the appointee of his title to the office."
"The appointment was defended by the argument that inasmuch as Mr Black was only fifty-one years old at the time and so would be ineligible for the increased emolument for nineteen years, it was not _as to him_ an increased emolument."
"[212] Similarly, measures authorizing the President to reorganize executive agencies have provided that a Reorganization Plan promulgated by him should be reported by Congress and should not become effective if one[213] or both[214] Houses adopted a resolution disapproving it."
[309] COMMERCE TODAY Later in his opinion Marshall qualified the word intercourse with the word commercial.
"[328] REGULATE Elucidating this word in his opinion for the Court in Gibbons _v._ Ogden, Chief Justice Marshall said: We are now arrived at the inquiry--What is this power?"
[347] Thus Congress was within its powers in vesting the Secretary of War with power to determine whether a structure of any nature in or over a navigable stream is an obstruction to navigation and to order its abatement if he so finds.
"At the outset of his opinion for the Court, Chief Justice Taft stated the general proposition that Congress can certainly regulate interstate commerce to the extent of forbidding and punishing the use of such commerce as an agency to promote immorality, dishonesty or the spread of any evil or harm to the people of other States from the State of origin."
"History has proved, however, that in this he builded better than he knew."
"In Brown _v._ Maryland,[553] Chief Justice Marshall, had remarked at the close of his opinion, We suppose the principles laid down in this case, apply equally to importations from a sister State."
";[584] so also as to brooms sent in quantity for the fulfillment of a number of orders, and subject to rejection by the purchaser if deemed by him not up to sample."
[586] Nor did it make any difference that the solicitor received his compensation in form of down payment by the purchaser.
"[628] In Crutcher _v._ Kentucky[629] a like result was reached, without assistance from an act of Congress, with respect to a Kentucky statute which provided that the agent of an express company not incorporated by the laws of that State should not carry on business there without first obtaining a license from the State, and that, preliminary thereto, he must satisfy the auditor of the State that the company he represented was possessed of an actual capital of at least $150,000."
"'Even interstate business must pay its way,' * * * and the bare fact that one is carrying on interstate commerce does not relieve him from many forms of State taxation which add to the cost of his business."
"[732] Justice Black, concurring in this view, added the caveat that the taxing rights of other States should not be foreclosed and made reference to his leave it to Congress notion."
"So remarks Chief Justice Stone in his summarizing opinion cited above, in Southern Pacific Co. _v._ Arizona."
"So it was held in Bradley _v._ Public Utilities Commission of Ohio,[828] in which the Court took cognizance of the full hearing accorded the appellant, and of his failure to choose another route, although he was at liberty to do so."
"Against this background the Court in 1941, in Edwards _v._ California,[953] held void a statute which penalized the bringing into that State, or the assisting to bring into it, any nonresident knowing him to be an indigent person."
"In this connection it has been held that even though an Indian has become a citizen, yet so long as he remains a member of his tribe, under the charge of an Indian agent, and so long as the United States holds in trust the title to land which has been allotted him, Congress can forbid the sale of intoxicants to him."
"[1058] But, as shown above, a naturalized citizen is subject at any time to have his good faith in taking the oath of allegiance to the United States inquired into, and to lose his citizenship if lack of such faith is shown in proper proceedings."
"[1059] Also, a person who has become a national by naturalization may lose his nationality by having a continuous residence for three years in the territory of a foreign state of which he was formerly a national or in which the place of his birth is situated, or by having a continuous residence for five years in any other foreign state or states."
"A State cannot denationalize a foreign subject who has not complied with federal naturalization law and constitute him a citizen of the United States, or of the State, so as to deprive the federal courts of jurisdiction over a controversy between him and a citizen of a State."
"[1064] RIGHT OF EXPATRIATION: LOSS OF CITIZENSHIP Notwithstanding evidence in early court decisions[1065] and in the Commentaries of Chancellor Kent of a brief acceptance of the ancient English doctrine of perpetual and unchangeable allegiance to the government of one's birth, whereby a citizen is precluded from renouncing his allegiance without permission of that government, the United States, since enactment of the act of 1868,[1066] if indeed not earlier, has expressly recognized the right of everyone to expatriate himself and choose another country."
"[1109] A State law governing fraudulent transfers was found to be compatible with the act of Congress,[1110] as was a statute which provided that a discharge in bankruptcy should be unavailing to terminate the suspension of the driver's license of a person who failed to pay a judgment rendered against him for damages resulting from his negligent operation of a motor vehicle."
"More recently, when reversing an order denying the second-class privilege to a mailable publication because of the poor taste and vulgarity of its contents, on the ground that the Postmaster General exceeding his statutory authority, Justice Douglas assumed, in the opinion of the Court, that Congress has a broad power of classification and need not open second-class mail to publications of all types."
"Peters's defense turned on the proposition that inasmuch as Wheaton had not complied with all of the requirements of the act of Congress, his alleged copyright was void."
"[1180] Congress may, however, modify rights under an existing patent, provided vested property rights are not thereby impaired,[1181] but it does not follow that it may authorize an inventor to recall rights which he has granted to others or reinvest in him rights of property which he had previously conveyed for a valuable and fair consideration."
"The President was bound to meet it in the shape it presented itself, without waiting for Congress to baptize it with a name; and no name given to it by him or them could change the fact."
"In England, the King possessed the power of raising armies in the time of peace according to his own good pleasure."
"[1240] Since the possession of government insurance payable to the person of his choice, is calculated to enhance the morale of the serviceman, Congress may permit him to designate any beneficiary he desires, irrespective of State law, and may exempt the proceeds from the claims of creditors."
"Other statutes clothed him with power to determine priority in car service,[1260] to license trade with the enemy and his allies,[1261] and to take over and operate the rail and water transportation system,[1262] and the telephonic and telegraphic communication systems,[1263] of the country."
"Any property which the enemy can use, either by actual appropriation, or by the exercise of control over the owner, no matter what his nationality, is a proper subject of confiscation."
"Congress may provide for immediate seizure of property which the President or his agent determines to be enemy property, leaving the question of enemy ownership to be settled later at the suit of a claimant."
"When various phases of this program were challenged, the Court held that in order to prevent espionage and sabotage, the freedom of movement of such persons could be restricted by a curfew order,[1314] even by a regulation excluding them from a defined area,[1315] but that a citizen of Japanese ancestry whose loyalty was concerned could not be detained against her will in a relocation camp."
"[1316] ALIEN ENEMIES The status of alien enemies was first considered in connection with the passage of the Alien Act of 1798,[1317] whereby the President was authorized to deport any alien or to license him to reside within the United States at any place to be designated by the President."
"[1437] While the Supreme Court conceded at an early date that the authority of the federal courts to entertain petitions for _habeas corpus_ derived solely from acts of Congress,[1438] a narrow majority recently asserted the right to expand the scope of the writ by judicial interpretation and to sanction its use for a purpose unknown to the common law, i.e., to bring a prisoner into court to argue his own appeal."
"II c. 2 (1679), where a person was detained pursuant to a conviction by a court having jurisdiction of the subject matter, _habeas corpus_ was available only if a want of jurisdiction appeared on the face of the record of the Court which convicted him."
"[1451] The proceeding may not be used to secure an adjudication of a question which, if determined in the prisoner's favor, could not result in his immediate release."
"Congress had levied, according to the rule of uniformity, a specific tax upon all carriages, for the conveyance of persons, which shall be kept by, or for any person, for his own use, or to be let out for hire, or for the conveying of passengers."
"Citing as an example the act of June 17, 1902[1537] where all moneys received from the sale and disposal of public lands in a large number of States and territories were set aside as a special fund to be expended under the direction of the Secretary of the Interior upon such projects as he determined to be practicable and advisable for the reclamation of arid and semi-arid lands within those States and territories, the Court declared: The constitutionality of this delegation of authority has never been seriously questioned."
"[1568] Changes in Punishment Statutes which changed an indeterminate sentence law to require a judge to impose the maximum sentence, whereas formerly he could impose a sentence between the minimum and maximum;[1569] abolished a rule which prevented a subsequent conviction of first-degree murder after a jury had found the accused guilty in the second-degree by a verdict which had been set aside;[1570] required criminals sentenced to death to be kept thereafter in solitary confinement,[1571] or allowed a warden to fix, within limits of one week, and keep secret the time of execution,[1572] were held to be _ex post facto_ as applied to offenses committed prior to their enactment."
"In Sturges _v._ Crowninshield,[1597] decided in 1819, Marshall defines obligation of contract as the law which binds the parties to perform their agreement; but a little later the same year he sets forth the points presented for consideration in Trustees of Dartmouth College _v._ Woodward[1598] to be: 1."
Marshall's answer to this can only be inferred from his statement at the end of his opinion.
[1618] The Dartmouth College Case The third view is the one formulated by Chief Justice Marshall in his controlling opinion in Trustees of Dartmouth College _v._ Woodward.
"Remedy a Part of the Obligation Suppose, however, that one of the parties to a contract fails to live up to his obligation as thus determined."
"In due course it became the accepted doctrine that that part of the law which supplies one party to a contract with a remedy if the other party does not live up to his agreement, as authoritatively interpreted, entered into the obligation of contracts in the constitutional sense of this term, and so might not be altered to the material weakening of existing contracts."
"Provided, the Court has said, a substantial or efficacious remedy remains or is given, by means of which a party can enforce his rights under the contract, the Legislature may modify or change existing remedies or prescribe new modes of procedure."
"[1739] When the importer has so acted upon the thing imported, wrote Chief Justice Marshall, that it has become incorporated and mixed up with the mass of property in the country, it has, perhaps, lost its distinctive character as an import, and has become subject to the taxing power of the State; but while remaining the property of the importer, in his warehouse, in the original form or package in which it was imported, a tax upon it is too plainly a duty on imports, to escape the prohibition in the Constitution."
"[86] In 1800, Secretary of the Treasury, Oliver Wolcott, Jr., addressed a letter to the House of Representatives advising them of his resignation from office and inviting an investigation of his office."
The charge * * * is that a legislative committee brought the weight of its authority down on respondent for exercising his right of free speech.
"[280] In an advisory opinion which it rendered for President Monroe at his request on the power of Congress to appropriate funds for public improvements, the Court answered that such appropriations might be properly made under the war and postal powers."
"Monroe himself ultimately adopted the broadest view of the spending power, from which, however, he carefully excluded any element of regulatory or police power."
"_See_ his Views of the President of the United States on the Subject of Internal Improvements, of May 4, 1822, 2 Richardson, Messages and Papers of the Presidents, 713-752."
"In his first annual message (December 4, 1865), President Johnson had asked Congress to prevent any selfish impediment [by the States] to the free circulation of men and merchandise."
"The doctrine of the case simmered down to the proposition that commerce was transportation only; a doctrine which Justice Harlan undertook to refute in his notable dissenting opinion: Interstate commerce does not, therefore, consist in transportation simply."
"In the First Employers' Liability Cases, (Howard _v._ Illinois Central R. Co., 207 U.S. 463 (1908)), the majority of the Court, speaking through Justice White, gave special attention to the Government's argument that though the act, in terms, governed the liability of every interstate carrier to any of its employees, whether engaged in interstate commerce or not when the liability fell, it was none the less constitutional because one who engaged in interstate commerce thereby submits all his business concerns to the regulating power of Congress."
"_See also_ Justice White's dissenting opinion, for himself, Chief Justice Fuller, and Justices Peckham and Holmes, in Northern Securities Co. _v._ United States, 193 U.S. 197, 396-397 (1904)."
_See_ his words in South Carolina State Highway Dept.
"An interesting concurring opinion was filed by Justice Douglas for himself and Justice Black: It is not enough, says Justice Douglas, that an article is new and useful."
"III and IV, for evidence of a judicial recognition of an inventor's inchoate right to have his invention patented."
"_See also_ his words in Satterlee _v._ Matthewson, 2 Pet."
"[1652] _See_ in this connection the cases cited by Justice Sutherland in his opinion for the Court in Phillips Petroleum Co. _v._ Jenkins, 297 U.S. 629 (1936)."
"They are the governor's, by direct grant of the people, and his alone."
"Especially has his role as Commander in Chief in wartime drawn nourishment from the same source, in recent years."
Ellsworth of Connecticut wished to see his _name or place_ inserted in the enacting clause of statutes.
"They contrived to make a ceremony of the President's appearances before Congress, his annual address to which, given in person, was answered by a reply equally formal."
"The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, which shall neither be encreased nor diminished during the Period for which he shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other Emolument from the United States, or any of them."
"Nor has any procedure been established for determining the question of inability, with the result that in the two instances of disability which have occurred, those of Presidents Garfield and Wilson, the former continued in office until his death and the other, after his partial recovery, till the end of his term."
"[41] The Acts of 1886 and 1947 By the Presidential Succession Act of January 19, 1886,[42] recently repealed, Congress provided that, in case of the disqualification of both President and Vice President, the Secretary of State should act as President provided he possessed the qualifications laid down in clause 5, above; if not, then the Secretary of the Treasury, etc."
[44] OATH OF OFFICE What is the time relationship between a President's assumption of office and his taking the oath?
"The answer then given was, that though the president might, there was no necessity that he should, take the command in person; and there was no probability that he would do so, except in extraordinary emergencies, and when he was possessed of superior military talents."
"[46] In 1850 Chief Justice Taney, for the Court, said: His [the President's] duty and his power are purely military."
"The President was bound to meet it in the shape it presented itself, without waiting for Congress to baptize it with a name; and no name given to it by him or them could change the fact."
"* * * Whether the President in fulfilling his duties, as Commander in Chief, in suppressing an insurrection, has met with such armed hostile resistance, and a civil war of such alarming proportions as will compel him to accord to them the character of belligerents, is a question to be decided _by him_, and this Court must be governed by the decisions and acts of the political department of the Government to which this power was entrusted."
"[53] IMPACT OF THE PRIZE CASES ON WORLD WARS I AND II In brief, the powers claimable for the President under the Commander in Chief clause at a time of wide-spread insurrection were equated with his powers under the clause at a time when the United States is engaged in a formally declared foreign war; and--impliedly--vice versa."
"Nor was any attention given the fact that Lincoln had asked Congress to ratify and confirm his acts, which Congress promptly did,[54] with the exception of his suspension of the _habeas corpus_ privilege which was regarded by many as attributable to the President in the situation then existing, by virtue of his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed."
"The Civil War being safely over, however, a sharply divided Court, in the elaborately argued Milligan case,[81] reverting to the older doctrine, pronounced void President Lincoln's action, following his suspension of the writ of _habeas corpus_ in September, 1863, in ordering the trial by military commission of persons held in custody as spies and abettors of the enemy."
"By section 67 of the Organic Act of April 30, 1900,[84] the Territorial Governor is authorized in case of rebellion or invasion, or imminent danger thereof, when the public safety requires it, [to] suspend the privilege of the writ of _habeas corpus_, or place the Territory, or any part thereof, under martial law until communication can be had with the President and his decision thereon made known."
It must be presumed that the President is not in his capacity as Supreme Commander bound by the prohibition in the Constitution of _ex post facto_ laws; nor does International Law forbid _ex post facto_ laws.
"[96] THE PRESIDENT AS COMMANDER OF THE FORCES While the President customarily delegates supreme command of the forces in active service, there is no constitutional reason why he should do so; and he has been known to resolve personally important questions of military policy."
"[97] In the absence of attempts by Congress to limit his power, he may establish and prescribe the jurisdiction and procedure of military commissions, and of tribunals in the nature of such commissions, in territory occupied by Armed Forces of the United States, and his authority to do this sometimes survives cessation of hostilities."
"[101] By the same warrant he may bring hostilities to a conclusion by arranging an armistice, stipulating conditions which may determine to a great extent the ensuing peace."
"[106] Such rules and regulations are, moreover, it would seem, subject in wartime to his amendment at discretion."
"14) did not prevent President Lincoln from promulgating in April, 1863 a code of rules to govern the conduct in the field of the armies of the United States which was prepared at his instance by a commission headed by Francis Lieber and which later became the basis of all similar codifications both here and abroad."
[110] But the provision is not regarded by the Court as preventing the President from displacing an officer of the Army or Navy by appointing with the advice and consent of the Senate another person in his place.
"A recent opinion by a New York surrogate deals adequately, though not authoritatively, with the subject: The President receives his compensation for his services, rendered as Chief Executive of the Nation, not for the individual parts of his duties."
"The President does not enlist in, and he is not inducted or drafted into the armed forces."
"[115] Pardons and Reprieves THE LEGAL NATURE OF A PARDON In the first case to be decided concerning the pardoning power, Chief Justice Marshall, speaking for the Court, said: As this power had been exercised from time immemorial by the executive of that nation whose language is our language, and to whose judicial institutions ours bear a close resemblance; we adopt their principles respecting the operation and effect of a pardon, and look into their books for the rules prescribing the manner in which it is to be used by the person who would avail himself of it."
"It may then be rejected by the person to whom it is tendered; and if it be rejected, we have discovered no power in a court to force it on him."
"Burdick, nevertheless, refused to accept the pardon and persisted in his contumacy with the unanimous support of the Supreme Court."
"In the second place, they are completed offenses;[128] the President cannot pardon by anticipation, otherwise he would be invested with the power to dispense with the laws, his claim to which was the principal cause of James II's forced abdication."
"Said he: The King of England before our Revolution, in the exercise of his prerogative, had always exercised the power to pardon contempts of court, just as he did ordinary crimes and misdemeanors and as he has done to the present day."
"A pardon reaches both the punishment prescribed for the offence and the guilt of the offender; and when the pardon is full, it releases the punishment and blots out of existence the guilt, so that in the eye of the law the offender is as innocent as if he had never committed the offense."
"[151] Conversely, the President may, if dissatisfied with amendments which have been affixed by the Senate to a proposed treaty or with the conditions stipulated by it to ratification, decide to abandon the negotiation, which he is entirely free to do."
"Nevertheless, as early as 1801, in United States _v._ Schooner Peggy,[165] the Supreme Court, speaking by Chief Justice Marshall, took notice of a treaty with France, executed after a court of admiralty had entered a final judgment condemning a captured French vessel, and finding it applicable to the situation before it, set the judgment aside and ordered the vessel restored to her owners."
"CONGRESSIONAL REPEAL OF TREATIES It is in respect to his contention that when it is asked to carry a treaty into effect Congress has the constitutional right, and indeed the duty, to determine the matter according to its own ideas of what is expedient, that Madison has been most completely vindicated by developments."
"TERMINATION OF TREATIES BY NOTICE The initial precedent in the matter of termination by notice occurred in 1846, when by the Joint Resolution of April 27, Congress authorized the President at his discretion to notify the British Government of the abrogation of the Convention of August 6, 1827, relative to the joint occupation of the Oregon Territory."
"As the President himself had requested the resolution, the episode supports the theory that international conventions to which the United States is party, even those terminable on notice, are terminable only by act of Congress."
"[186] When, however, by section 34 of the Jones Merchant Marine Act of 1920 the same President was authorized and directed within ninety days to give notice to the other parties to certain treaties, which the act infracted, of the termination thereof, he refused to comply, asserting that he did not deem the direction contained in section 34 * * * an exercise of any constitutional power possessed by Congress."
"[204] Justice Sutherland's later assertion in the Curtiss-Wright case[205] that the powers to declare and wage war, to conclude peace, to make treaties, etc., belong to the Federal Government as the necessary concomitants of nationality leaves even less room for the notion of a limited treaty-making power, as indeed appears from his further statement that as a member of the family of nations, the right and power of the United States * * * are equal to the right and power of the other members of the international family."
The President's power to enter into agreements or compacts with other governments without consulting the Senate must be referred to his powers as organ of foreign relations and as Commander in Chief.
"The question was put to Secretary Lansing himself in 1918 by a member of the Foreign Relations Committee, as follows: Has the so-called Lansing-Ishii Agreement any binding force on this country?"
"The legislation referred to was the Lend-Lease Act of March 11, 1941[262] by which the President was empowered for something over two years--and subsequently for additional periods whenever he deemed it in the interest of the national defense to do so, to authorize the Secretary of War, the Secretary of the Navy, or the head of any other department or agency of the Government, to manufacture in the government arsenals, factories, and shipyards, or otherwise procure, to the extent that available funds made possible, defense articles--later amended to include foodstuffs and industrial products--and sell, transfer title to, exchange, lease, lend, or otherwise dispose of, the same to the government of any country whose defense the President deems vital to the defense of the United States, and on any terms that he deems satisfactory."
"PRESIDENTIAL DIPLOMATIC AGENTS What the President may have lost in consequence of the intervention of Congress in this field, he has made good through his early conceded right to employ, in the discharge of his diplomatic function, so-called special, personal, or secret agents without consulting the Senate."
"By instructions from the President, he was afterwards authorized to employ Joseph Donaldson as agent in that business."
"The Senate may suggest conditions and limitations to the President, but it cannot vary those submitted by him, for no appointment can be made except on his nomination, agreed to without qualification or alteration."
"When Senate Consent Is Complete Early in January, 1931 the Senate requested President Hoover to return its resolution notifying him that it advised and consented to certain nominations to the Federal Power Commission."
"The nominees involved having meantime taken the oath of office and entered upon the discharge of their duties, the President responded with a refusal, saying: I cannot admit the power in the Senate to encroach upon the executive functions by removal of a duly appointed executive officer under the guise of reconsideration of his nomination."
"[305] But a Senate recess does not include holiday or temporary adjournments,[306] while by an act of Congress, if the vacancy existed when the Senate was in session, the _ad interim_ appointee may receive no salary until he has been confirmed by the Senate."
[311] The holding in the Myers case boils down to the proposition that the Constitution endows the President with an illimitable power to remove all officers in whose appointment he has participated with the exception of judges of the United States.
"[313] Thus spoke the former President Taft, and the result of his prepossession was a rule which, as was immediately pointed out, exposed the so-called independent agencies, the Interstate Commerce Commission, the Federal Trade Commission, and the like, to Presidential domination."
"The Committee, said Madison, has gone through the bill without making any provision respecting the tenure by which the comptroller is to hold his office."
"The principal duty seems to be deciding upon the lawfulness and justice of the claims and accounts subsisting between the United States and particular citizens: this partakes strongly of the judicial character, and there may be strong reasons why an officer of this kind should not hold his office at the pleasure of the executive branch of the government."
"The actual decision in the _Myers_ Case finds support in the theory that such an office is merely one of the units in the executive department and, hence, inherently subject to the exclusive and illimitable power of removal by the Chief Executive, whose subordinate and aid he is."
"[317] But in the absence of specific legislative provision to the contrary, the President may remove at his discretion an inferior officer whose term is limited by statute,[318] or one appointed with the consent of the Senate."
Morgan from the chairmanship of TVA for refusal to produce evidence in substantiation of charges which he had levelled at his fellow directors.
"Conversely, the President is not obliged by this clause to impart information which, in his judgment, should in the public interest be withheld."
"'I inform you of the fact,' he said, 'by authority from the President.'"
"[337] THE LOGAN ACT When in 1798 a Philadelphia Quaker named Logan went to Paris on his own to undertake a negotiation with the French Government with a view to averting war between France and the United States his enterprise stimulated Congress to pass An Act to Prevent Usurpation of Executive Functions,[338] which, more honored in the breach than the observance, still survives on the statute books."
"[344] JEFFERSON'S REAL POSITION Nor did Jefferson himself officially support Madison's point of view, as the following extract from his minutes of a Conversation, which took place July 10, 1793, between himself and Citizen Genet, show: He asked if they [Congress] were not the sovereign."
"In consequence of his power to receive and dispatch diplomatic agents, but more especially the former, the President possesses the power to recognize new States, communities claiming the status of belligerency, and changes of government in established states; also, by the same token, the power to decline recognition, and thereby decline diplomatic relations with such new States or governments."
"In numerous other cases, the recognition was given by the Executive solely on his own responsibility."
"Diplomacy, they said, was now at an end and the President himself had appealed to Congress to provide a solution for the Cuban situation."
[352] CONGRESSIONAL IMPLEMENTATION OF PRESIDENTIAL POLICIES No President was ever more jealous of his prerogative in the realm of foreign relations than President Woodrow Wilson.
"Three principal questions arise: first, how does the President exercise the powers which the Constitution or the statutes confer upon him; second, in what relation does he stand by virtue of the take care clause to the powers of other executive, or administrative agencies; third, in what relation does he stand to the enforcement of the criminal laws of the United States?"
"HOW THE PRESIDENT'S OWN POWERS ARE EXERCISED Whereas the British monarch is constitutionally under the necessity of acting always through agents if his acts are to receive legal recognition, the President is presumed to exercise certain of his constitutional powers personally."
"No act of Congress, no act even of the President himself, can, by constitutional possibility, authorize or create any military officer not subordinate to the President."
"[378] The general rule, as stated by the Court, is that when any duty is cast by law upon the President, it may be exercised by him through the head of the appropriate department, whose acts, if performed within the law, thus become the President's acts."
"The President's duty in general requires his superintendence of the administration; yet he cannot be required to become the administrative officer of every department and bureau, or to perform in person the numerous details incident to services which, nevertheless, he is, in a correct sense, by the Constitution and laws required and expected to perform."
"The former were, he pointed out, entirely in the political field, and hence for their discharge the Secretary was left responsible absolutely to the President."
"[387] ADMINISTRATIVE DECENTRALIZATION VERSUS JACKSONIAN CENTRALISM An opinion rendered by Attorney General Wirt in 1823 asserted the proposition that the President's duty under the take care clause required of him scarcely more than that he should bring a criminally negligent official to book for his derelictions, either by removing him or by setting in motion against him the processes of impeachment or of criminal prosecution."
"Here it is asserted that the entire executive power is vested in the President; that the power to remove those officers who are to aid him in the execution of the laws is an incident of that power; that the Secretary of the Treasury was such an officer; that the custody of the public property and money was an executive function exercised through the Secretary of the Treasury and his subordinates: that in the performance of these duties the Secretary was subject to the supervision and control of the President: and finally that the act establishing the Bank of the United States did not, as it could not change the relation between the President and Secretary--did not release the former from his obligation to see the law faithfully executed nor the latter from the President's supervision and control."
"[390] In short, the President's removal power, in this case unqualified, was the sanction provided by the Constitution for his power and duty to control his subordinates in all their official actions of public consequence."
"[393] The former decision is still valid to support the President's right to remove, and hence to control the decisions of, all officials through whom he exercises the great political powers which he derives from the Constitution; also all officials--usually heads of departments--through whom he exercises powers conferred upon him by statute."
"In neither case is the President entitled to force his reading of the law upon the officer, but only to take care that the latter exercise his powers according to his own best lights."
"The President felt himself in a dilemma, whether if it was by statute the duty of the District Attorney to prosecute or not, the President could interfere and direct whether to proceed or not."
"The opinion was written by Taney, then Attorney-General; it is full of pertinent illustrations as to the necessity in an administration of full power in the chief executive as the concomitant of his full responsibility."
"And if that officer still continue a prosecution which the President is satisfied ought not to continue, the removal of the disobedient officer and the substitution of one more worthy in his place would enable the President through him faithfully to execute the law."
"[394] THE PRESIDENT AS LAW INTERPRETER The power accruing to the President from his function of law interpretation preparatory to law enforcement is daily illustrated in relation to such statutes as the Anti-Trust Acts, the Taft-Hartley Act, the Internal Security Act, and many lesser statutes."
"Speaking for a unanimous Court, one Justice being absent, Justice Holmes said: Of course the plaintiff's position is that he has been deprived of his liberty without due process of law."
"So long as such arrests are made in good faith and in the honest belief that they are needed in order to head the insurrection off, the Governor is the final judge and cannot be subjected to an action after he is out of office on the ground that he had not reasonable ground for his belief."
"* * * If the President is of the opinion that the relations of this country with foreign nations are, or are likely to be, endangered by action deemed by him inconsistent with a due neutrality, it is his right and duty to protect such relations; and in doing so, in the absence of any statutory restrictions, he may act through such executive office or department as appears best adapted to effectuate the desired end."
"Acts of lawless violence, or of threatened violence to the citizen or his property, cannot be anticipated and provided for; and the protection, to be effectual or of any avail, may, not unfrequently, require the most prompt and decided action."
Secretary Sawyer forthwith issued an order seizing the mills and directing their presidents to operate them as operating managers for the United States in accordance with his regulations and directions.
"The President promptly reported these events to Congress, conceding Congress's power to supersede his Order; but Congress failed to do anything about the matter either then or a fortnight later, when the President again brought up the subject in a special message."
Justice Clark expressly limited his concurrence to the judgment of the Court.
As Chief Justice Vinson recites in his opinion: This action was challenged in Congress on the ground that no specific statute prescribed the method to be used in executing the treaty.
"[436] Conversely, when President Wilson failed in March 1917 to obtain Congress's consent to his arming American merchant vessels with defensive arms, he went ahead and did it anyway, fortified not only by the known sentiments of the majority in Congress but also by the advice of his Secretary of State and Attorney General."
For the faithful execution of such laws the President has back of him not only each general law-enforcement power conferred by the various acts of Congress but the aggregate of all such laws plus that wide discretion as to method vested in him by the Constitution for the purpose of executing the laws.
"[443] Said Justice Reed, in his concurring opinion of the case: The relatively new technique of temporary taking by eminent domain is a most useful administrative device: many properties, such as laundries, or coal mines, or railroads, may be subjected to public operation only for a short time to meet war or emergency needs, and can then be returned to their owners."
"[445] The doctrine dictated by the above considerations as regards the exercise of executive power in the field of legislative power was well stated by Mr John W. Davis, principal counsel on the present occasion for the steel companies, in a brief which he filed nearly forty years ago as Solicitor General, in defense of the action of the President in withdrawing certain lands from public entry although his doing so was at the time contrary to express statute."
"Instances wherein the President has felt and fulfilled such a duty have not been rare in our history, though, being for the public benefit and approved by all, his acts have seldom been challenged in the courts."
[460] Justice Clark bases his position directly upon Chief Justice Marshall's opinion in Little _v._ Barreme.
"That the President does possess a residual of resultant power above, or in consequence of, his granted powers to deal with emergencies in the absence of restrictive legislation is explicitly asserted by Justice Clark, and impliedly held, with certain qualifications, by Justice Frankfurter and, again less clearly, by Justice Jackson; and is the essence of the position of the three dissenting Justices."
"It would seem to follow that whenever the President so acts on his own initiative he should at once report his action to Congress, and thenceforth bring the full powers of his office to the support of the desires of the Houses once these are clearly indicated."
"PRESIDENTIAL IMMUNITY FROM JUDICIAL DIRECTION By the decision of the Court in State of Mississippi _v._ Johnson,[467] in 1867, the President was put beyond the reach of judicial direction in the exercise of any of his powers, whether constitutional or statutory, political or otherwise."
"An application for an injunction to forbid President Johnson to enforce the Reconstruction Acts, on the ground of their unconstitutionality, was answered by Attorney General Stanbery as follows: It is not upon any peculiar immunity that the individual has who happens to be President; upon any idea that he cannot do wrong; upon any idea that there is any particular sanctity belonging to him as an individual, as is the case with one who has royal blood in his veins; but it is on account of the office that he holds that I say the President of the United States is above the process of any court or the jurisdiction of any court to bring him to account as President."
[469] The Court further indicated that the same principle would apply to an application for a mandamus ordering the President to exercise any of his powers.
"THE PRESIDENT'S SUBORDINATES AND THE COURTS But while the courts are unable to compel the President to act or to keep him from acting, yet his acts, when performed are in proper cases subject to judicial review and disallowance."
"[480] Again, in discussing the President's power of removal, he maintained that the wanton removal from office of meritorious officers would be an act of maladministration, and would render the President liable to impeachment."
"19, 32-33 (1827), asserting the finality of the President's judgment of the existence of a state of facts requiring his exercise of the powers conferred by the act of 1795."
"The treaty was an old one, and its construction had been constantly the subject of controversy between the two countries, and therefore, to obviate what I felt would produce unnecessary trouble in our foreign relations, I indicated to the Russian ambassador the situation, and advised him that I deemed it wise to abrogate the treaty, which, as President, I had the right to do by due notice couched in a friendly and courteous tone and accompanied by an invitation to begin negotiations for a new treaty."
The President himself had asked only for ratification and approval of his course by the Senate.
"A different theory is offered by Justice Story in his opinion for the Court in Prigg _v._ Pennsylvania, 16 Pet."
"Story was here in quest of arguments to prove that Congress had power to enact a fugitive slave law, which he based on its power to carry into effect rights expressly given and duties expressly enjoined by the Constitution."
"It was headed by Mr Elihu Root, with the rank of ambassador, while some of his associates bore the rank of envoy extraordinary."
"In his message of April 13, 1822, President Monroe stated the thesis that, as a general principle, * * * Congress have no right under the Constitution to impose any restraint by law on the power granted to the President so as to prevent his making a free selection of proper persons for these [newly created] offices from the whole body of his fellow-citizens."
"[312] The reticence of the Constitution respecting removal left room for four possibilities, _first_, the one suggested by the common law doctrine of estate in office, from which the conclusion followed that the impeachment power was the only power of removal intended by the Constitution; _second_, that the power of removal was an incident of the power of appointment and hence belonged, at any rate in the absence of legal or other provision to the contrary, to the appointing authority; _third_, that Congress could, by virtue of its power to make all laws which shall be necessary and proper, etc., determine the location of the removal of power; _fourth_, that the President by virtue of his executive power and his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed, possesses the power of removal over all officers of the United States except judges."
"In the course of the debate on the act to establish a Department of Foreign Affairs (later changed to Department of State) all of these views were put forward, with the final result that a clause was incorporated in the measure which implied, as pointed out above, that the head of the department would be removable by the President at his discretion."
"The doctrine of estate in office was countenanced by Chief Justice Marshall in his opinion in Marbury _v._ Madison, 1 Cr."
"Letter of Attorney General McReynolds to the Secretary to the President, dated August 28, 1914, stating that it would be incompatible with the public interest to send to the Senate in response to its resolution, reports made to the Attorney General by his associates regarding violations of law by the Standard Oil Co. Letter of Attorney General Gregory to the President of the Senate, dated February 23, 1915, declining to comply with a resolution of the Senate requesting the Attorney General to report to the Senate his findings and conclusions in the investigation of the smelting industry."
"Early in October, 1950 President Harold Stassen of the University of Pennsylvania announced that he had written Premier Stalin offering to confer with him respecting issues between the two governments."
[349] Said Senator Nelson of Minnesota: The President has asked us to give him the right to make war to expel the Spaniards from Cuba.
"* * * It is open to a friendly government to assert that such is the public status of the vessel and to claim her immunity from suit, either through diplomatic channels or, if it chooses, as a claimant in the courts of the United States."
"[379] The President, in the exercise of his executive powers under the Constitution, may act through the head of the appropriate executive department."
"[383] It is manifestly impossible for the President to execute every duty, and every detail thereof, imposed upon him by the Congress."
"Nevertheless, the authorities indicate that the President cannot, without statutory authority, delegate a discretionary duty, relieving himself of all responsibility, so that the duty when performed will not be his act but wholly the act of another."
"409 (1792), in which the Court rejected Attorney General Randolph's contention that he had the right _ex officio_ to move for a writ of _mandamus_ ordering the United States circuit court for Pennsylvania to put the Invalid Pension Act into effect."
"The Act was the direct outcome of suggestions made by Washington in his message of December 5, 1793."
"It should be noted, however, that if the President fails to act, or if he adopts a narrow construction of a statute which he dislikes, and on this ground professes inability to act, the only remedy available against him is impeachment."
"497 (1840); and Riverside Oil Co. _v._ Hitchcock, 190 U.S. 316 (1903), where the rule is reiterated that neither injunction nor mandamus will lie against an officer to control him in the exercise of an official duty which requires the exercise of his judgment and discretion."
"Is impeachment the only way in which Congress, or either house thereof, is constitutionally entitled to call the President to account for his conduct in office?"
"In Gordon _v._ United States,[17] the Court refused to hear an appeal, probably for the reasons given in Chief Justice Taney's opinion which he did not deliver because of his death before the Court reconvened but which was published many year later."
"The judge must banish the slightest personal impulse to reprisal, but he should not bend backward and injure the authority of the court by too great leniency."
"All we can say upon the whole matter is that where conditions do not make it impracticable, or where the delay may not injure public or private right, a judge called upon to act in a case of contempt by personal attack upon him, may, without flinching from his duty, properly ask that one of his fellow judges take his place."
"[48] In a dictum in Ex parte Grossman,[49] Chief Justice Taft, while holding for the Court on the main issue that the President may pardon a criminal contempt, declared that he may not pardon a civil contempt."
"Although Chief Justice Marshall regarded the rule-making power as essentially legislative in nature, he ruled that Congress could delegate to the courts the power to vary minor regulations in the outlines marked out by the statute."
"In so doing the Court rejected dicta in earlier cases which classified the Court of Claims as a constitutional court and silently reversed Miles _v._ Graham,[127] which had held that Congress could not include the salary of a judge of the Court of Claims in his taxable income."
Likewise in United States _v._ Ferreira[129] the Court sustained the act conferring powers on the Florida territorial court to examine claims arising under the Spanish treaty and to report his decisions and the evidence on which they were based to the Secretary of the Treasury for subsequent action.
"[164] Likewise, the Court has held that the general interest of a citizen in having the government administered by law does not give him a standing to contest the validity of governmental action."
[166] Similarly an electric power company has been held not to have a sufficient interest to maintain an injunction suit to restrain the making of federal loans and grants to municipalities for the construction or purchase of electric power distribution plants on the ground that the lender owes the sufferer no enforcible duty to refrain from making the unauthorized loan; and the borrower owes him no obligation to refrain from using the proceeds in any lawful way the borrower may choose.
The State's counsel contended that enforcement of the acts brought about an immediate paralysis of all the authority and power of the State government by military force; * * * [which was divesting the State] of her legally and constitutionally established and guaranteed existence as a body politic and a member of the Union.
"As stated by Justice Jackson, when the Court refused to review an order of the Civil Aeronautics Board, which in effect was a mere recommendation to the President for his final action, To revise or review an administrative decision which has only the force of a recommendation to the President would be to render an advisory opinion in its most obnoxious form--advice that the President has not asked, tendered at the demand of a private litigant, on a subject concededly within the President's exclusive, ultimate control."
One of the first acts of Jefferson was his instruction to Secretary of State Madison to withhold commissions to office which remained undelivered.
"Since 1948 the United States Code has provided for the removal to a federal district court of civil actions or criminal prosecutions in State courts against any officer of the United States or any agency thereof, or person acting under him, for any act under color of such office or on account of any right, title or authority claimed under any Act of Congress for the apprehension or punishment of criminals or the collection of the revenue."
"Thus, it has been held that a suit against the Secretary of the Treasury to review his decision on the rate of duty to be exacted on imported sugar would disturb the whole revenue system of the Government and would in effect be a suit against the United States."
"[448] Third, cases involving injury to a plaintiff because the official has exceeded his statutory authority."
"[493] In his dictum in Cohens _v._ Virginia, Chief Justice Marshall also indicated that perhaps no jurisdiction existed over suits by States to enforce their penal laws."
"[542] In Baltimore and Ohio R. Co. _v._ Baugh,[543] which further projected the Tyson rule into the law of torts in disregard of State law, Justice Field wrote a sharp dissent in which he indicated an opinion that the Supreme Court's disregard of State court decisions was unconstitutional."
"[552] Justice Butler, joined by Justice McReynolds, concurred in the result, because in his view Tompkins was not entitled to damages under general law, but he deprecated the reversal of Swift _v._ Tyson."
The State court ignored the mandate and once again the governor of the State announced that he would meet such usurpation by the Supreme Court with determined resistance.
"Subsequently, the same provisions have been construed to procure the release of a deputy United States marshal from State custody for killing a man while protecting a Justice of the Supreme Court under a Presidential order which was regarded as a law of the United States;[688] the release of an election official held under State authority for perjury on the ground that jurisdiction to punish a false witness belonged to the federal courts in this instance;[689] and the release of a collector of internal revenue held in Kentucky for his refusal to file copies of his official papers with a State court."
"Furthermore, the Supreme Court will, in the exercise of a sound discretion, issue a writ of mandamus to compel a federal court to remand to a State court a prosecution of a federal officer removed to it, when it appears that the officer in question, in seeking removal, failed to make a candid, specific, and positive explanation of his relation to the transaction giving rise to the crime for which he was indicted."
"In Ponzi _v._ Fessenden,[699] the matter at issue was the authority of the Attorney General of the United States to consent to the transfer on a writ of _habeas corpus_ of a federal prisoner to a State court to be there put on trial upon indictments there pending against him."
[728] The Burr Trial Not long afterward the Chief Justice went to Richmond to preside over the trial of Burr himself.
"[732] The Court in a five-to-four opinion by Justice Jackson in effect took the former view holding that the two-witness principle interdicted imputation of _incriminating acts_ to the accused by circumstantial evidence or by the testimony of a single witness,[733] even though the single witness in question was the accused himself."
"[735] Here it was held that although the overt acts relied upon to support the charge of treason--defendant's harboring and sheltering in his home his son who was an enemy spy and saboteur, assisting him in purchasing an automobile, and in obtaining employment in a defense plant--were all acts which a father would naturally perform for a son, this fact did not necessarily relieve them of the treasonable purpose of giving aid and comfort to the enemy."
"Speaking for the Court, Justice Jackson said: No matter whether young Haupt's mission was benign or traitorous, known or unknown to the defendant, these acts were aid and comfort to him."
"If proof be added that the defendant knew of his son's instructions, preparation and plans, the purpose to aid and comfort the enemy becomes clear."
"After Japan's surrender, he registered as an American citizen; swore that he was an American citizen and had not done various acts amounting to expatriation; and returned to this country on an American passport."
"An American citizen, it continued, owes allegiance to the United States wherever he may reside, and dual nationality does not alter the situation."
Because of the constitutional doubts of the President the act was accompanied by an explanatory joint resolution which stipulated that only a life estate terminating with the death of the offender could be sold and that at his death his children could take the fee simple by descent as his heirs without deriving any title from the United States.
"Corruption of blood as a result of attainder of treason was cited as an example of the former and was defined as the disability of any of the posterity of the attainted person to claim any inheritance in fee simple, either as heir to him, or to any ancestor above him."
"In his dissent in this case, Justice Holmes stated that unless a judge has power to lay hold of anyone who ventures to publish anything that tends to make him unpopular or to belittle him * * *."
Justice Holmes was joined in his dissent by Justices Brandeis and Stone.
"In the curious case of Ex parte Levitt, Petitioner, 302 U.S. 633 (1937), the Court was asked to purge itself of Justice Black on the ground that his appointment to it violated the second clause of section 6 of Article I."
"967) Congress added a new section to existing _habeas corpus_ provisions which stipulated that no application for a writ of _habeas corpus_ by a person in custody pursuant to a judgment of a State court shall be granted until the applicant has exhausted the remedies available in the courts of the States and that an applicant shall not be deemed to have exhausted State remedies if he has the right under State law to raise, by any available procedure, the question presented, 28 U.S.C.A."
Earlier Justice Jackson had declared that this phase of treason consists of two elements: adherence to the enemy; and rendering him aid and comfort.
"Justice Murphy in a solitary dissent stated: But the act of providing shelter was of the type that might naturally arise out of petitioner's relationship to his son, as the Court recognizes."
"Most frequently applied examples of these rules include the following: the rule that a marriage which is good in the country where performed (_lex loci_) is good elsewhere; likewise the rule that contracts are to be interpreted in accordance with the laws of the country where entered into (_lex loci contractus_) unless the parties clearly intended otherwise; also the rule that immovables may be disposed of only in accordance with the law of the country where situated (_lex rei sitae_);[1] also the converse rule that chattels adhere to the person of their owner and hence are disposable by him, even when located elsewhere, in accordance with the law of his domicile (_lex domicilii_); also the rule that regardless of where the cause arose, the courts of any country where personal service can be got upon the defendant will take jurisdiction of certain types of personal actions, hence termed transitory, and accord such remedy as the _lex fori_ affords."
"[5] And in Hampton _v._ McConnell[6] some years later, Chief Justice Marshall went even further, using language which seems to show that he regarded the judgment of a State court as constitutionally entitled to be accorded in the courts of sister States not simply the faith and credit of conclusive evidence, but the validity of a final judgment."
"[10] If the court has acquired jurisdiction, the judgment is entitled to full faith and credit though the court may not be able to enforce it by execution in the State in which it was rendered, as where the defendant left the State after service upon him and took all his property with him."
"[31] THE JURISDICTIONAL QUESTION In short, when the subject matter of a suit is merely the determination of the defendant's liability, it is necessary that it should appear from the record that the defendant had been brought within the jurisdiction of the court by personal service of process, or his voluntary appearance, or that he had in some manner authorized the proceeding."
"[45] SERVICE ON OUT-OF-STATE OWNERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES By analogy to the above cases, it has been held that a State may require nonresident owners of motor vehicles to designate an official within the State as an agent upon whom process may be served in any legal proceedings growing out of their operation of a motor vehicle within the State;[46] and while these cases arose under the Fourteenth Amendment alone, unquestionably a judgment validly obtained upon this species of service could be enforced upon the owner of a car through the courts of his home State."
"Inasmuch as the findings of the requisite jurisdictional facts, unlike those in the Second Williams Case, were made in proceedings in which the defendant appeared and participated, the requirements of full faith and credit were held to bar him from collaterally attacking such findings in a suit instituted by him in his home State of Massachusetts, particularly in the absence of proof that the divorce decree was subject to such collateral attack in a Florida court."
The result of the proceedings thus instituted is that a judgment is entered in C's favor against A to the amount of his indebtedness to B.
"Subsequently A is sued by B in their home State, and offers the judgment, which he has in the meantime paid, in defense."
"Earlier, such actions had rested upon the common law, which was fairly uniform throughout the States, so that there was usually little discrepancy between the law under which the plaintiff from another jurisdiction brought his action (_lex loci_) and the law under which the defendant responded (_lex fori_)."
[105] One such relationship is that of a stockholder and his corporation.
"[120] However, in an unacknowledged departure from this ruling the Court has subsequently held that the full faith and credit clause did not preclude California from disregarding a Massachusetts workmen's compensation statute and applying its own conflicting act in the case of an injury suffered by a Massachusetts employee of a Massachusetts employer while in California in the course of his employment."
"However, a compensation award by State A to a resident employee of a resident employer injured on the job in State B will not preclude State B from awarding added compensation under its own laws, when the compensation statute of State A does not expressly exclude recovery under a law of the State in which the injury occurred and when the State A award incorporated a private settlement contract wherein the employee reserved his rights in State B."
"The third theory of the clause is that it guarantees to the citizen of any State the rights which he enjoys as such even when sojourning in another State, that is to say, enables him to carry with him his rights of State citizenship throughout the Union, without embarrassment by State lines."
"[160] The right of a State to the fisheries within its borders he then held to be in the nature of a property right, held by the State for the use of the citizens thereof; the State was under no obligation to grant co-tenancy in the common property of the State, to the citizens of all the other States."
"[176] The constitutional requirement is satisfied if the nonresident is given access to the courts of the State upon terms which, in themselves, are reasonable and adequate for the enforcing of any rights he may have, even though they may not be technically the same as those accorded to resident citizens."
"Likewise, a Tennessee statute which made the amount of the annual license tax exacted for the privilege of doing railway construction work dependent upon whether the person taxed had his chief office within or without the State, was found to be incompatible with the comity clause."
"[193] The duty to surrender is not absolute and unqualified; if the laws of the State to which the fugitive has fled have been put in force against him, and he is imprisoned there, the demands of those laws may be satisfied before the duty of obedience to the requisition arises."
"[200] A person indicted a second time for the same offense is nonetheless a fugitive from justice by reason of the fact that after dismissal of the first indictment, on which he was originally indicted, he left the State with the knowledge of, or without objection by, State authorities."
[201] But a defendant cannot be extradited if he was only constructively present in the demanding State at the time of the commission of the crime charged.
[204] PROCEDURE FOR REMOVAL Only after a person has been charged with crime in the regular course of judicial proceedings is the governor of a State entitled to make demand for his return from another State.
[205] The person demanded has no constitutional right to be heard before the governor of the State in which he is found on the question whether he has been substantially charged with crime and is a fugitive from justice.
"[209] A defendant will, however, be discharged on _habeas corpus_ if he shows by clear and satisfactory evidence that he was outside the demanding State at the time of the crime."
"Consequently the owner of a slave had the same right to seize and repossess him in another State, as the local laws of his own State conferred upon him, and a State law which penalized such seizure was held unconstitutional."
"In Texas _v._ White[282] the Supreme Court declared that the action of the President in setting up provisional governments at the end of the war was justified, if at all, only as an exercise of his powers as Commander in Chief and that such governments were to be regarded merely as provisional regimes to perform the functions of government pending action by Congress."
Not one of this latter group can now retain any feeling of security in his divorce decree.
"[68] 334 U.S. 378 (1948).--In a dissenting opinion filed in the case of Sherrer _v._ Sherrer, but applicable also to the case of Coe _v._ Coe, Justice Frankfurter, with Justice Murphy concurring, asserted his inability to accept the proposition advanced by the majority that regardless of how overwhelming the evidence may have been that the asserted domicile in the State offering bargain-counter divorces was a sham, the home State of the parties is not permitted to question the matter if the form of a controversy had been gone through."
[16] An employee of the Post Office Department is not required to submit to examination by State authorities concerning his competence and to pay a license fee before performing his official duty in driving a motor truck for transporting the mail.
"Invoking the supremacy clause, the Supreme Court held that a person could not be guilty of a crime under State law for doing what it was his duty to do as an officer of the United States."
"[60] One hundred and thirteen years later, the Court did answer the last part of his inquiry in the affirmative."
"[13] THE WALL OF SEPARATION DOCTRINE In 1802 President Jefferson wrote a letter to a group of Baptists in Danbury, Connecticut in which he declared that it was the purpose of the First Amendment to build a wall of separation between Church and State,[14] and in Reynolds _v._ United States,[15] the first Anti-Mormon Case, Chief Justice Waite, speaking for the unanimous Court, characterized this as almost an authoritative declaration of the scope and effect of the amendment, one which left Congress free to reach actions which were in violation of social duties or subversive of good order."
Neither can force nor influence a person to go to or to remain away from church against his will or force him to profess a belief or disbelief in any religion.
"[20] Justice Frankfurter presented a concurring opinion for himself and Justices Jackson, Rutledge and Burton."
"[33] The Court held that appellant's interest as taxpayers was insufficient to constitute a justiciable case or controversy, while as to the alleged rights of the child involved the case had become moot with her graduation from school."
"[43] To permit a man to excuse conduct in violation of law on the ground of religious belief would be to make the professed doctrines of religious belief superior to the law of the land, and in effect to permit every citizen to become a law unto himself."
"In one the conviction of a Baptist minister for conducting religious services in the streets of New York City without first obtaining a permit from the city police commissioner was overturned,[58] a permit having been refused him on the ground that he had in the past ridiculed other religious beliefs thereby stirring strife and threatening violence."
"The license was withheld on the premise that a conscientious belief in nonviolence to the extent that the believer would not use force to prevent wrong, no matter how aggravated, made it impossible for him to swear in good faith to support the State Constitution."
"In a dissenting opinion in which Justices Douglas, Murphy and Rutledge concurred, Justice Black said, I cannot agree that a State can lawfully bar from a semipublic position a well-qualified man of good character solely because he entertains a religious belief which might prompt him at some time in the future to violate a law which has not yet been and may never be enacted."
"[67] EFFECT OF AMENDMENT I ON THE COMMON LAW Blackstone was declaring the Common Law of his day, and it was no intention of the framers of Amendment I to change that law."
"In Frohwerk _v._ United States[87] he said: With regard to the argument [on the constitutional question] we think it necessary to add to what has been said in Schenck _v._ United States, * * *, only that the First Amendment while prohibiting legislation against free speech as such cannot have been, and obviously was not, intended to give immunity for every possible use of language."
[88] In Debs _v._ United States[89] he referred to the natural and intended effect and probable effect[90] of the condemned speech (straight common law).
"When conditions show the speaker that this is the case, as it did here, there certainly comes a point beyond which he cannot indulge in provocations to violence without being answerable to society."
"[127] By close divisions, it also sustained the right of a State to forbid the conscription of neutrals by the picketing of a restaurant solely because the owner had contracted for the erection of a building (not connected with the restaurant and located some distance away) by a contractor who employed nonunion men;[128] or the picketing of a shop operated by the owner without employees to induce him to observe certain closing hours."
"Except where the authority of the licensing officer is so closely limited as to leave no room for discrimination against utterances he does not approve,[165] the Supreme Court has struck down licensing ordinances, even in respect of a form of communication which may be prohibited entirely."
"Justice Jackson also protested: We cannot, he said, give some constitutional rights a preferred position without relegating others to a deferred position."
"In contrast, there is ample justification for a legislative judgment that the conspiracy now before us is a substantial threat to national order and security,[224] which seems to be in essential agreement with the position of the Chief Justice and his three associates."
"The former reiterated his position in Bridges _v._ California; the latter italicized Justice Brandeis' dictum in the Whitney Case: If there be time to expose through discussion the falsehood and fallacies, to avert the evil by the processes of education, the remedy to be applied is more speech, not enforced silence."
"From time immemorial, one's reputation has been determined in part by the company he keeps."
"It would, however, be arrant dogmatism, quite outside the scope of our authority in passing on the powers of a State, for us to deny that the Illinois legislature may warrantably believe that a man's job and his educational opportunities and the dignity accorded him may depend as much on the reputation of the racial and religious group to which he willy-nilly belongs, as on his own merits."
"[250] The case arose on indictments under section 6 of the so-called Enforcement Act of May 30, 1870,[251] which read as follows: That if two or more persons shall band or conspire together, or go in disguise upon the public highway, or upon the premises of another, with intent to violate any provision of this act, or to injure, oppress, threaten, or intimidate any citizen, with intent to prevent or hinder his free exercise and enjoyment of any right or privilege granted or secured to him by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or because of his having exercised the same, such persons shall be held guilty of felony, etc."
"Mann, however, strongly resented the charge that he was opposed to religious instruction in the public schools."
"Horace Mann was opposed to sectarian doctrinal instruction in the schools, but he repeatedly urged the teaching of the elements of religion common to all of the Christian sects."
"Once in office, nevertheless, Jefferson himself appealed to the discredited principle against partisan critics."
"It should be noted that Justice Holmes couples with his invocation of the clear and present danger test in his dissent in this case the contention that rightly construed the act of Congress involved (The Espionage Act of May 16, 1918; 40 Stat."
He wrote: I am aware of course that the word intent as vaguely used in ordinary legal discussion means no more than knowledge at the time of the act that the consequences said to be intended will ensue.
Justice Holmes presented a dissenting opinion for himself and Justice Brandeis which contains a curious note of fatalism.
"He said: If what I think the correct test is applied, it is manifest that there was no present danger of an attempt to overthrow the government by force on the part of the admittedly small minority who shared the defendant's views."
"* * * But those extravagances * * *, do not justify penalizing the speaker by depriving him of the platform or by punishing him for his conduct."
"In Teamsters Union _v._ Hanke, 339 U.S. 470 (1950), injunctions by State courts against picketing of a self-employer's place of business to compel him to adopt a union shop were sustained."
"The Supreme Court has said that the constitutional guarantee of liberty 'embraces not only the right of a person to be free from physical restraint, but the right to be free in the enjoyment of all his faculties * * *.'"
One who is subjected to forced listening is not free in the enjoyment of all his faculties.
The teacher is no longer a stimulant to adventurous thinking; she becomes instead a pipe line for safe and sound information.
Nor does it apply to statements made by an accused on his own premises to an undercover agent whose identity was not suspected and who had on his person a radio transmitter which communicated the statements to another agent outside the building.
[23] A warrant issued upon an information stating only that affiant has good reason to believe and does believe that defendant has contraband materials in his possession is clearly bad under the Fourth Amendment.
"Not until Boyd _v._ United States[28] did it have to meet the issue; there, pursuant to an act of Congress, a court had issued an order in a proceeding for the forfeiture of goods for fraudulent nonpayment of customs duties, requiring the claimant to produce in court his invoices covering the goods, on pain of having the allegation taken as confessed against him."
"The order and the statute which authorized it were held unconstitutional in a notable opinion by Justice Bradley, as follows: Breaking into a house and opening boxes and drawers are circumstances of aggravation; but any forcible and compulsory extortion of a man's own testimony or of his private papers to be used as evidence to convict him of crime or to forfeit his goods, is [forbidden] * * * In this regard the Fourth and Fifth Amendments run almost into each other."
"[33] Even an individual cannot refuse to produce records which are in his custody on the plea that they might incriminate the owner or himself where the documents belong to a corporation,[34] or to a labor union."
[36] Papers already in the custody of a United States court in consequence of their having been used by the owner himself as evidence on another proceeding may be used before a grand jury as a basis for an indictment for perjury.
"[42] As a means of enforcing a valid statute, the Government may require any person subject thereto to keep a record showing whether he has in fact complied with it,[43] and to submit that record to inspection by government officers."
"To derive from the common law right to search the person as an incident of his arrest the right of indiscriminate search of all his belongings, is to disregard the fact that the Constitution protects [against] both unauthorized arrest and unauthorized search."
"Thereupon, over his objection, they searched the desk, safe and file cabinets in the office for about an hour and a half and seized 573 forged and altered stamps."
"* * * The measure of legality of such a seizure is, therefore, that the seizing officer shall have reasonable or probable cause for believing that the automobile which he stops and seizes has contraband liquor therein which is being illegally transported."
It added: Nor do we think the accused was compelled to incriminate himself.
"[34] Where a person is convicted of a crime which includes several incidents, a second trial for one of those incidents puts him twice in jeopardy."
"What the advocates of the maxim meant was merely that a person ought not to be put on trial and compelled to answer questions to his detriment unless he had first been properly accused, i.e., by the grand jury."
[49] The witness must explicitly claim his constitutional immunity or he will be considered to have waived it;[50] but he is not the final judge of the validity of his claim.
"[51] The privilege exists solely for the protection of the witness himself, and may not be claimed for the benefit of third parties."
"[52] The clause does not impair the obligation of a witness to testify if a prosecution against him is barred by lapse of time, by statutory enactment, or by a pardon;[53] but the effect of a mere tender of pardon by the President remains uncertain."
[54] A witness may not refuse to answer questions on the ground that he would thereby expose himself to prosecution by a state.
"[55] Conversely, the admission against a defendant in a federal court of testimony given by him in a state court under a statute of immunity is valid."
"[56] If an accused takes the stand in his own behalf, he must submit to cross-examination;[57] while if he does not, it is by no means certain that the trial judge in a federal court may not, without violation of the clause, draw the jury's attention to the fact."
[61] An individual who has acquired income by illicit means is not excused from making out an income tax return because he might thereby expose himself to a criminal prosecution by the United States.
"[62] But a witness called to testify before a federal grand jury as to his relations with the Communist Party cannot, in view of existing legislation touching the subject, be compelled to answer."
[65] A bankrupt is not deprived of his constitutional right not to testify against himself by an order requiring him to surrender his books to a duly authorized receiver.
"[76] There, by a five-to-four majority, the Court held that the privilege against self incrimination does not extend to books and records which an individual is required to keep to evidence his compliance with lawful regulations."
"This statute, in turn, harks back to the famous chapter 29 of Magna Carta (issue of 1225), where the King promises that no free man (_nullus liber homo_) shall be taken or imprisoned or deprived of his freehold or his liberties or free customs, or outlawed or exiled, or in any manner destroyed, nor shall we come upon him or send against him, except by a legal judgment of his peers or by the law of the land (_per legem terrae_)."
"The Court has relied upon this provision in holding that an accused shall plead, or be ordered to plead, or a plea of not guilty be entered for him before his trial proceeds;[96] and in ruling that if the accused is in custody he must be personally present at every stage of the trial where his substantial rights may be affected by the proceedings against him."
A decree _pro confesso_ entered against a defendant after striking his answer from the files for contempt of court is void.
"[140] In contrast with the decision in United States _v._ Ju Toy[141] that a person seeking entrance to the United States was not entitled to a judicial hearing on his claim of citizenship, a person arrested and held for deportation is entitled to a day in court if he denies that he is an alien."
"Chief Justice Stone indicated that any other construction would raise grave constitutional doubts,[154] while in a concurring opinion, Justice Murphy asserted unequivocally that the act would be inconsistent with the Fifth Amendment if the bargaining agent, acting under color of federal authority, were permitted to discriminate against any of the persons he was authorized to represent."
[192] The right to sue for recovery of taxes paid may be conditioned upon an appeal to the Commissioner and his refusal to refund.
[289] The Government does not have to compensate a riparian owner for cutting off his access to navigable waters by changing the course of the stream in order to improve navigation.
[292] The interest of a riparian owner in keeping the level of a navigable stream low enough to maintain a power head for his use was not one for which he was entitled to be compensated when the Government raised the level by erecting a dam to improve navigation.
"[324] Where property of a citizen has been mistakenly seized by the Government, converted into money and invested, the owner is entitled, in recovering compensation, to an allowance for the use of his property."
"[328] The federal courts may take jurisdiction of an action in ejectment by a citizen against officers of the Government, to recover property of which he has been deprived by force and which has been converted to the use of the Government without lawful authority and without just compensation."
"[330] The Fifth Amendment does not require that compensation shall actually be paid in advance of the taking[331] but the owner is entitled to reasonable, certain, and adequate provision for obtaining compensation before his occupancy is disturbed."
"If Congress by the easy device of requiring a man to keep the private papers that he has customarily kept can render such papers 'public' and nonprivileged, there is little left to either the right of privacy or the constitutional privilege."
"[22] When a person is charged with more than one crime, the right to a speedy trial does not require that he be first tried on the earliest indictment; no constitutional right is violated by removing him to another jurisdiction for trial on a later indictment."
But every opinion which a juror may entertain does not necessarily disqualify him.
"[34] Where a United States Senator was indicted for agreeing to receive compensation for services to be rendered in a proceeding before a government department, and it appeared that a tentative arrangement for such services was made in Illinois and confirmed in St. Louis, the defendant was properly tried in St. Louis, although he was not physically present in Missouri when notice of ratification was dispatched."
[42] Definition of Crime The effect of the clause entitling an accused to know the nature and cause of the accusation against him commences with the statutes fixing or declaring offenses.
"[50] The indictment charged that in beating to death a man whom they had just arrested, these officers had deprived him of life without due process of law."
[65] The constitutional right to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation entitles the defendant to insist that the indictment apprise him of the crime charged with such reasonable certainty that he can make his defense and protect himself after judgment against another prosecution on the same charge.
"[79] Since deportation proceedings are not criminal in character, the admission of testimony given by the alien during investigation prior to arrest did not render the hearing unfair, despite the fact that he had not been advised of his right to have counsel or to decline to answer questions as to his alienage."
"[80] The right to counsel is violated where, over the defendant's objection, the court requires his counsel to represent a co-defendant whose interest may possibly conflict with his;[81] likewise where the trial judge decided, without notice to a defendant and without his presence, that the latter had consented to be represented by counsel who also represented another defendant in the same case."
"Justice Field pointed the way for this development in his dissenting opinion in O'Neil _v._ Vermont,[12] wherein the majority refused to apply the Eighth Amendment to a State."
"Thus, suits brought against State officials acting either in excess of their statutory authority[20] or in pursuance of an unconstitutional statute[21] are suits against the officer in his individual capacity and therefore are not prohibited by the Eleventh Amendment; and suits against an officer for the commission of a common law tort alleged to be justified by a statute or administrative order of the State belong to the same category."
"[26] However, mandamus proceedings to compel a State official to perform a plain or ministerial duty which admits of no discretion are not suits against the State since the official is regarded as acting in his individual capacity in failing to act according to law."
"Until Reagan _v._ Farmers' Loan and Trust Company[29] the Court maintained a distinction between the duty imposed upon an official by the general laws of the State and the duty imposed by a specific unconstitutional statute and held that whereas an injunction would not lie to restrain a State official from enforcing an act alleged to be unconstitutional in pursuance of the general duties of his office, it would lie to restrain him from performing special duties vested in him by an unconstitutional statute."
"Although the Court long ago held that the sovereign immunity of the State prevented a suit to recover money in the general treasury,[44] it also held that a suit would lie against a revenue officer to recover tax moneys illegally collected and still in his possession."
"_See also_ Rolston _v._ Missouri Fund Commissioners, 120 U.S. 390, 411 (1887), where it is held that an injunction would lie to restrain the sale of a railroad on the ground that a suit to compel a State official to do what the law requires of him is not a suit against the State."
"One Blair did so refuse and was upheld, in mandamus proceedings, by the State Supreme Court, which ordered the Chairman of the State Democratic Executive Committee to certify him to the Secretary of State as a candidate for the office of Presidential Elector in the Democratic Primary to be held on May 6, 1952."
"But it is also true that the Amendment does not prohibit an elector's announcing his choice beforehand, pledging himself."
"[2] Under the Twentieth Amendment,  3, in case a President is not chosen before the time for beginning of his term, the Vice President-elect shall act as President, until a President shall have qualified."
"[7] Several years later, in Bailey _v._ Alabama,[8] the Court voided another Alabama statute which made the refusal without just cause to perform the labor called for in a written contract of employment, or to refund the money or pay for the property advanced thereunder, _prima facie_ evidence of an intent to defraud and punishable as a criminal offense; and which was enforced subject to a local rule of evidence which prevented the accused, for the purpose of rebutting the statutory presumption, from testifying as to his uncommunicated motives, purpose, or intention."
"[9] In 1914, in United States _v._ Reynolds,[10] a third Alabama enactment was condemned as conducive to peonage through the permission it accorded to persons, fined upon conviction for a misdemeanor, to confess judgment with a surety in the amount of the fine and costs, and then to agree with said surety, in consideration of the latter's payment of the confessed judgment, to reimburse him by working for him upon terms approved by the court, which, the Court pointed out, might prove more onerous than if the convict had been sentenced to imprisonment at hard labor in the first place."
"Although the Georgia statute prohibited the defendant from testifying under oath, it did not prevent him from entering an unsworn denial both of the contract and of the receipt of any cash advancement thereunder, a factor which, the Court emphasized, was no more controlling than the customary rule of evidence in the Bailey Case."
"Thus, a State has inherent power to require every able-bodied man within its jurisdiction to labor for a reasonable time on public roads near his residence without direct compensation."
"[64] Deploring such attempts, nullified consistently in the preceding cases, to convert the due process clause into a substantive restraint on the powers of the States, Justice Miller in Davidson _v._ New Orleans[65] obliquely counseled against a departure from the conventional application of the clause, albeit he acknowledged the difficulty of arriving at a precise, all inclusive, definition thereof."
"[89] In part, Justice Holmes's criticism of his colleagues was unfair, for his rational and fair man could not function in a vacuum, and, in appraising the constitutionality of State legislation, could no more avoid being guided by his preferences or economic predilections than were the Justices constituting the majority."
"Not only did the Court take judicial notice of the demands for relief arising from the depression when it overturned prior holdings and sustained minimum wage legislation,[94] but in upholding State legislation designed to protect workers in their efforts to organize and bargain collectively, the Court virtually had to exclude from consideration the employer's contention that such legislation interfered with his liberty of contract in contravention of the due process clause and to exalt as a fundamental right the correlative liberty of employees, which right the State legislatures were declared to be competent to protect against interference from private sources."
"[100] Ordinarily, the mere interest of an official as such, in contrast to an actual injury sustained by a natural or artificial person through invasion of personal or property rights, has not been deemed adequate to enable him to invoke the protection of the Fourteenth Amendment against State action."
"Without doubt, it denotes not merely freedom from bodily restraint but also right of the individual to contract, to engage in any of the common occupations of life, to acquire useful knowledge, to marry, establish a home and bring up children, to worship God according to the dictates of his own conscience, and generally to enjoy those privileges long recognized at common law as essential to the orderly pursuit of happiness by free men."
"[116] However, a person cannot be deprived of his liberty under a vague statute which subjected to fine or imprisonment, as a gangster, any one not engaged in any lawful occupation, known to be a member of a gang consisting of two or more persons, and who had been convicted of a crime in any State in the Union."
"[117] Liberties Pertaining to Education (of Teachers, Parents, Pupils).--A State law forbidding the teaching in any private denominational, parochial, or public school, of any modern language, other than English, to any child who has not successfully passed the eighth grade was declared, in Meyer _v._ Nebraska[118] to be an unconstitutional interference with the right of a foreign language teacher to teach and of parents to engage him so to instruct their children."
"[120] As to a student, neither his liberty to pursue his happiness nor his property or property rights were infringed when he was denied admission to a State university for refusing to comply with a law requiring renunciation of allegiance to, or affiliation with, a Greek letter fraternity."
"[144] * * * These decisions have established the propositions that the rules of law concerning the employer's responsibility for personal injury or death of an employee arising in the course of employment are not beyond alteration by legislation in the public interest; that no person has a vested right entitling him to have these any more than other rules of law remain unchanged for his benefit; and that, if we exclude arbitrary and unreasonable changes, liability may be imposed upon the employer without fault, and the rules respecting his responsibility to one employee for the negligence of another and respecting contributory negligence and assumption of risk are subject to legislative change."
"[145] Accordingly, a State statute which provided an exclusive system to govern the liabilities of employers and the rights of employees and their dependents, in respect of compensation for disabling injuries and death caused by accident in certain hazardous occupations,[146] was held not to work a deprivation of property without due process of law in rendering the employer liable irrespective of the doctrines of negligence, contributory negligence, assumption of risk, and negligence of fellow-servants, nor in depriving the employee, or his dependents, of the higher damages which, in some cases, might be rendered under these doctrines."
"Specifically, the Court in the Senn Case gave its approval to the application of a Wisconsin statute which authorized the giving of publicity to labor disputes, declared peaceful picketing and patrolling lawful, and prohibited the granting of injunctions against such conduct to a controversy in which the matter at issue was the refusal of a tiling contractor employing nonunion workmen to sign a closed shop agreement unless a provision requiring him to abstain from working in his business as a tile layer or helper should be eliminated."
"[169] Also in harmony with the last mentioned pair of cases is Auto Workers _v._ Wisconsin Board[170] in which was upheld enforcement of the Wisconsin Employment Peace Act which proscribed as an unfair labor practice efforts of a union, after collective bargaining negotiations had become deadlocked, to coerce an employer through a slow-down in production achieved by the irregular, but frequent, calling of union meetings during working hours without advance notice to the employer or notice as to whether or when the employees would return, and without informing him of the specific terms sought by such tactics."
"Thus, not only must a person challenging a rate assume the burden of proof,[202] but he must present a case of manifest constitutional invalidity;[203] and if, notwithstanding his effort, the question of confiscation remains in doubt, no relief will be granted."
"[308] Blue Sky Laws; Laws Regulating Boards of Trade, Etc.--In the exercise of its power to prevent fraud and imposition, a State may regulate trading in securities within its borders, require a license of those engaging in such dealing, make issuance of a license dependent on a public officer's being satisfied of the good repute of the applicants, and permit him, subject to judicial review of his findings, to revoke the same."
"[328] For the same reason, a State may not prevent a citizen from concluding with a foreign life insurance company at its home office a policy loan agreement whereby the policy of his life is pledged as collateral security for a cash loan to become due upon default in payment of premiums, in which case the entire policy reserve might be applied to discharge the indebtedness."
"[361] Thus a statute which defines waste as including, in addition to its ordinary meaning, economic waste, surface waste, and waste incident to production in excess of transportation or marketing facilities or reasonable market demands, and which provides that whenever full production from a common source of supply can be obtained only under conditions constituting waste, a producer may take only such proportion of all that may be produced from such common source without waste, as the production of his wells bears to the total production of such common source, is not repugnant to the due process clause."
[369] Water A statute making it unlawful for a riparian owner to divert water into another State does not deprive him of property without due process of law.
"[418] And to implement such prohibition, a State has the power to declare that places where liquor is manufactured or kept shall be deemed common nuisances;[419] and even to subject an innocent owner to the forfeiture of his property for the acts of a wrongdoer."
"[428] Any appropriate means adopted to insure compliance and care on the part of licensees and to protect other highway users being consonant with due process, a State may also provide that one, against whom a judgment is rendered for negligent operation and who fails to pay it within a designated time, shall have his license and registration suspended for three years, unless, in the meantime, the judgment is satisfied or discharged."
The deceased husband's heirs cannot contend that the impairment of the widow's waiver by subsequent legislation deprived his estate of property without due process of law.
"[441] Man's Best Friend A statute providing that no dog shall be entitled to the protection of the law unless placed upon the assessment rolls, and that in a civil action for killing a dog the owner cannot recover beyond the value fixed by himself in the last assessment preceding the killing is within the police power of the State."
"The securities in question, which had never been used by the creditor in any business in the issuing State, were located in the State in which the creditor had his domicile, and were deemed to be taxable only in the latter."
"Taking cognizance of the fact that this doctrine had never been extended to the field of income taxation or consistently applied in the field of property taxation, where the concepts of business situs as well as of domiciliary situs had been utilized to sustain double taxation, especially in connection with shares of corporate stock, the Court declared that a correct interpretation of constitutional requirements would dictate the following conclusions: From the beginning of our constitutional system control over the person at the place of his domicile and his duty there, common to all citizens, to contribute to the support of government have been deemed to afford an adequate constitutional basis for imposing on him a tax on the use and enjoyment of rights in intangibles measured by their value."
These statements represented a belated adoption of the views advanced by Chief Justice Stone in dissenting or concurring opinions which he filed in three of the four decisions rendered during 1930-1932.
"In Graves _v._ Elliott,[530] decided in the same year, the Court upheld the power of New York, in computing its estate tax, to include in the gross estate of a domiciled decedent the value of a trust of bonds managed in Colorado by a Colorado trust company and already taxed on its transfer by Colorado, which trust the decedent had established while in Colorado and concerning which he had never exercised any of his reserved powers of revocation or change of beneficiaries."
"[579] But when a resident policyholder's loan is merely charged against the reserve value of his policy, under an arrangement for extinguishing the debt and interest thereon by deduction from any claim under the policy, such credit is not taxable to the foreign insurance company."
"[586] Notice and Hearing in Relation to General Taxes Of the different kinds of taxes which the State may impose, there is a vast number of which, from their nature, no notice can be given to the taxpayer, nor would notice be of any possible advantage to him, such as poll taxes, license taxes (not dependent upon the extent of his business), and generally, specific taxes on things, or persons, or occupations."
"If the tax be not paid, the property of the delinquent may be sold, and he be thus deprived of his property."
"Thus, if the tax on animals be a fixed sum per head, or on articles a fixed sum per yard, or bushel, or gallon, there is nothing the owner can do which can affect the amount to be collected from him."
"So, if a person wishes a license to do business of a particular kind, or at a particular place, such as keeping a hotel or a restaurant, or selling liquors, or cigars, or clothes, he has only to pay the amount required by law and go into the business."
"[598] On the other hand, if the area of the assessment district was not determined by the legislature, a landowner does have the right to be heard respecting benefits to his property before it can be included in the improvement district and assessed; but due process is not denied if, in the absence of actual fraud or bad faith, the decision of the agency vested with the initial determination of benefits is made final."
"[599] The owner has no constitutional right to be heard in opposition to the launching of a project which may end in assessment; and once his land has been duly included within a benefit district, the only privilege which he thereafter enjoys is to a hearing upon the apportionment; that is, the amount of the tax which he has to pay."
"[600] Nor can he rightfully complain because the statute renders conclusive, after said hearing, the determination as to apportionment by the same body which levied the assessment."
"[605] A State statute, consistently with due process, may designate a corporation as the agent of a nonresident stockholder to receive notice and to represent him in proceedings for correcting assessments."
"Where tax proceedings are _in rem_, owners are bound to take notice thereof, and to pay taxes on their property, even if assessed to unknown or other persons; and if an owner stands by and sees his property sold for delinquent taxes, he is not thereby wrongfully deprived of his property."
"[612] Likewise a car company, which failed to report its gross receipts as required by statute, has no further right to contest the State comptroller's estimate of those receipts and his adding thereto the 10% penalty permitted by law."
"[617] In collecting personal income taxes, however, most States require employers to deduct and withhold the tax from the wages of only nonresident employees; but the duty thereby imposed on the employer has never been viewed as depriving him of property without due process of law, nor has the adjustment of his system of accounting and paying salaries which withholding entails been viewed as an unreasonable regulation of the conduct of his business."
"On the contrary, the seven Justices maintained that although a State legislature may prescribe a form of procedure to be observed in the taking of private property for public use, * * * it is not due process of law if provision be not made for compensation * * * The mere form of the proceeding instituted against the owner, * * *, cannot convert the process used into due process of law, if the necessary result be to deprive him of his property without compensation."
"[651] However, there must be something more than an ordinary honest mistake of law in the proceedings for compensation before a party can make out that the State has deprived him of his property unconstitutionally."
"[652] Unless, by its rulings of law, the State court prevented a complainant from obtaining substantially any compensation, its findings as to the amount of damages will not be overturned on appeal, even though as a consequence of error therein the property owner received less than he ought."
"[670] (2) Hearing.--The necessity and expediency of a taking being legislative questions irrespective of who may be charged with their decision, a hearing thereon need not be afforded;[671] but the mode of determining the compensation payable to an owner must be such as to furnish him with an opportunity to be heard."
"Through such an appeal the owner obtains the hearing to which he is entitled;[672] and the fact that after having been adequately notified of the determination by the condemning authorities, the former must exercise his right of appeal within a limited period thereafter, such as 30 days, has been held not so arbitrary as to deprive him of property without due process of law."
"[688] That condition is fulfilled; that is, a State is deemed capable of exerting jurisdiction over an individual if he is physically present within the territory of the State, if he is domiciled in the State although temporarily absent therefrom, or if he has consented to the exercise of jurisdiction over him."
"[695] Similarly, in a suit against a local partnership, in which the resident partner was duly served with process and the nonresident partner was served only with notice, a judgment thus obtained is binding upon the firm and the resident partner, but is not a personal judgment against the nonresident and cannot be enforced by execution against his individual property."
"[696] That the nonresident partner should have been so protected is attributable to the fact the process of a court of one State cannot run into another and summon a party there domiciled to respond to proceedings against him, when neither his person nor his property is within the jurisdiction of the Court rendering the judgment."
"[697] In the case of a resident, however, absence alone will not defeat the processes of courts in the State of his domicile; for domicile is deemed to be sufficient to keep him within reach of the State courts for purposes of a personal judgment, whether obtained by means of appropriate, substituted service, or by actual personal service on the resident at a point outside the State."
"If the statute imposed either on the plaintiff himself, or upon the official designated to accept process or some other, the duty of communicating by mail or otherwise with the defendant this requirement is met; but if the act exacts no more than service of process on the local agent, it is unconstitutional, notwithstanding that the defendant may have been personally served in his own State."
"[709] Moreover, even when the cause of action arose in the forum State and suit was instituted by a corporation chartered therein, a foreign company retailing clothing in Oklahoma was held immune from service of process on its president when the latter visited New York on one of his periodic trips there for the purchase of merchandise."
"[729] Thus, in a proceeding against an estate involving a suit against an administratrix to foreclose a mortgage executed by the decedent, the heir, notwithstanding that the suit presents an adverse claim the disposition of which may be destructive of his title to land deriving from the decedent, may properly be represented by the administratrix and is not entitled to personal notification or summons."
The mortgagor must seek his remedy against the sheriff upon his bond.
"Thus, if a business is susceptible of being viewed as injurious to public health, morals, safety, and convenience, as, for example, saloons, pool rooms, and dance halls, the licensee is deemed to have entered upon such line of endeavor with advance knowledge of the State's right to withdraw his license therefor summarily."
"Prompt protection of the public in such instances is said to outweigh the advantages of a slower procedure, retarded by previous notice and hearing, and to require that the person adversely affected seek his remedy from the Court via a petition to review or to enjoin the decision of the licensing authorities."
"[764] Pleas in Abatement.--State legislation which forbids a defendant to come into court and challenge the validity of service upon him in a personal action without thereby surrendering himself to the jurisdiction of the Court, but which does not restrain him from protecting his substantive rights against enforcement of a judgment rendered without service of process, is constitutional and does not deprive him of property without due process of law."
"Thus, by statute a State validly may provide that one sued in a possessory action cannot bring an action to try title until after judgment shall have been rendered in the possessory action, and until he shall have paid the judgment, if the decision shall have so awarded."
"Whatever this fine be called, whether it be a penalty, or punishment, or civil judgment, it comes to the convict as the result of his crime."
"A right to defeat a just debt by the statute of limitation * * * [not being] a vested right, such as is protected by the Constitution, accordingly no offense against the Fourteenth Amendment is committed by revival, through an extension or repeal, of an action on an implied obligation to pay a child for the use of her property,[780] or a suit to recover the purchase price of securities sold in violation of a Blue Sky Law,[781] or a right of an employee to seek, on account of the aggravation of a former injury, an additional award out of a State administered fund."
"[796] As a basis for distinguishing these last two decisions the Court observed that while the decisions are manifold that within [the] limits of fairness[797] and reason the burden of proof may be shifted to the defendant even in criminal prosecutions, nevertheless, to be justified, the evidence held to be inculpatory * * * [must have had] at least a sinister significance * * *, or if this at times be lacking, there must be in any event a manifest disparity in convenience of proof and opportunity for knowledge, * * * Whereas, accordingly, under the terms of the section previously upheld, the defendant could prove his citizenship without trouble, and the State, if forced to disprove his claim, could be relatively helpless, the background of the accused party being known probably only to himself and close relatives, the alleged Japanese defendant, in the last mentioned case, would have suffered hardship and injustice if compelled to prove non-Japanese origin, especially since ineligibility renders criminal conduct otherwise lacking in sinister significance (occupation of land under lease from an American codefendant)."
"Substitution for a presentment or indictment by a grand jury of the proceeding by information, after examination and commitment by a magistrate, certifying to the probable guilt of the defendant, with the right on his part to the aid of counsel, and to the cross-examination of the witnesses produced for the prosecution is due process of law."
"[817] For want of adequate enjoyment of the right to counsel, the Court, in Powell _v._ Alabama,[818] overturned the conviction of Negroes who had received sentences of death for rape, and asserted that, at least in capital cases, where the defendant is unable to employ counsel and is incapable adequately of making his own defense because of ignorance, illiteracy, or the like, it is the duty of the court, whether requested or not, to assign counsel for him as a necessary requisite of due process of Law."
"[825] Accordingly, an indigent farm laborer was deemed not to have been denied due process of law when he was convicted of robbery by a Maryland county court, sitting without a jury, which was not required by statute[826] to honor his request for counsel and whose practice, in fact was to afford counsel only in murder and rape cases."
"A layman, the Court added, is usually no match for the skilled prosecutor whom he confronts in the court room."
"[837] That record included only the indictment, the judgment on the plea of guilty to a charge of murder, the minute entry bearing on the sentence, and the sentence, together with a lengthy recital in the judgment to the effect that when the defendant expressed a desire to plead guilty the Court explained to him the consequence of such plea, his rights in the premises, especially, his rights to have a lawyer appointed to defend him and to be tried before a jury, and the degree of proof required for an acquittal under a not guilty plea, but that the defendant persisted in his plea of guilty."
"[841] In the former the Court ruled that where it appears that the trial court, before accepting pleas of guilty to charges of burglary and larceny by defendants, aged 34 and 58 respectively, advised each of his rights of trial and of the consequences of such a plea, the fact that the record reveals no express offer of counsel would not suffice to show that the accused were deprived of rights essential to the fair hearing required by the due process clause."
"On his subsequent conviction in 1941, which took into account his earlier sentence of 1938, the defendant was deemed to have had full opportunity to contest the constitutionality of his earlier sentence."
"In this latter decision, the accused, an 18-year-old Italian immigrant, unable to understand the English language, was convicted of murder and sentenced to life imprisonment on a plea of guilty when, notwithstanding a recital in the record that he was arraigned in open court and advised through interpreters, one of whom was the arresting officer, of the meaning and effect of a guilty plea, and that he signed a statement waiving a jury trial and pleading guilty, the waiver was not in fact signed by him and no plea of guilty actually had been entered."
"Thus, the absence of counsel competent to advise a 15-year-old Negro boy of his rights was one of several factors operating in Haley _v._ Ohio[845] to negative the propriety of admitting in evidence a confession to murder and contributing to the conclusion that the boy's conviction had resulted from proceedings that were unfair."
"Emphasizing that there were no exceptional circumstances * * * present, the majority asserted that it rather overstrains our credulity to believe that [such a defendant would be ignorant] of his right [to request and] to engage counsel."
"In Uveges _v._ Pennsylvania,[852] it was held that inasmuch as the record showed that a State court did not attempt to make a 17-year-old youth understand the consequences of his plea of guilty to four separate indictments charging burglary, for which he could be given sentences aggregating 80 years, and that the youth was neither advised of his right to counsel nor offered counsel at any time between arrest and conviction, due process was denied him."
"On the authority of the Uveges Case, accused's failure to request counsel, since it could be attributed to ignorance of his right thereto, was held not to constitute a waiver."
Only when the accused refuses counsel with an understanding of his rights can the Court dispense with counsel.
"Where the gravity of the crime and other factors--such as the age and education of the defendant,[860] the conduct of the court or the prosecuting officials,[861] and the complicated nature of the offense charged and the possible defenses thereto[862]--render criminal proceedings without counsel so apt to result in injustice as to be fundamentally unfair, the latter group [majority] holds that the accused must have legal assistance under the amendment whether he pleads guilty or elects to stand trial, whether he requests counsel or not."
"Although compulsory processes of justice may be used to call the accused as a witness and to require him to testify, compulsion by torture to extort a confession is a different matter."
"[883] Procuring a conviction for a capital crime by use of a confession extracted by protracted interrogation conducted in a similar manner was, on the authority of Chambers _v._ Florida, condemned in White _v._ Texas;[884] and in Lisenba _v._ California,[885] a case rendered inconclusive by conflicting testimony, the Court remarked, by way of dictum, that the concept of due process would void a trial in which, by threats or promises in the presence of court and jury, a defendant was induced to testify against himself, or in which a confession is used which is procured * * * by fraud, collusion, trickery and subornation or perjury."
"Justice Jackson, joined by Justices Frankfurter and Roberts, dissented on the ground that the accused not only denied that the protracted questioning had the effect of forcing an involuntary confession from him but that he had ever confessed at all, a contention which reputable witnesses contradicted."
"[888] Justice Jackson protested that interrogation _per se_ is not, * * *, an outlaw; and that inasmuch as all questioning is 'inherently coercive' * * *, the ultimate question * * * [must be] whether the confessor was in possession of his own will and self-control at the time of [his] confession."
"[900] In a concurring opinion concerning the scope of the protection afforded by this clause of the Fourteenth Amendment, Justice Frankfurter contended that further argument thereon is foreclosed by Twining _v._ New Jersey, a precedent, on which he commented as follows: Decisions of this Court do not have equal intrinsic authority."
"[901] In dissenting Justice Black, who was supported by Justice Douglas, attached to his opinion an appendix which contains * * * [his] resume, * * *, of the Amendment's history."
"In conclusion, Justice Black expresses his fears as to the consequences of the Court's practice of substituting its own concepts of decency and fundamental justice for the language of the Bill of Rights * * *[902] In all but one of the remaining cases, the Court sided with the accused and supported his contention that the confession on which his conviction was based had been procured by methods contrary to the requirements of due process."
"[904] The application of duress being indisputed, a unanimous Court, in Lee _v._ Mississippi,[905] citing as authority all the preceding cases beginning with Brown _v._ Mississippi, held that a conviction resulting from such use of a coerced confession, however, is no less void because the accused testified at some point in the proceeding that he had never in fact confessed, voluntarily or involuntarily."
"At his trial, the prosecuting attorney admitted that a hearing was withheld until interrogation had produced a confession."
"* * * When a suspect speaks because he is overborne, it is immaterial whether he has been subjected to a physical or a mental ordeal."
"[926] Such language appears to effect the very absorption into the Fourteenth Amendment which Justice Frankfurter rejects in the Adamson case; but he concluded by adding that as long as a State [does not] affirmatively * * * sanction * * * [arbitrary] police incursion into privacy; that is, as long as its police are deterred from making searches without authority of law by virtue of such internal discipline as an alert public opinion may induce and by reason of the statutory or common law remedies which the victims of such illegal searches may invoke, a State, without running counter to the due process clause, may employ at a trial incriminating evidence obtained by unlawful search and seizure."
"Again Justice Frankfurter spoke for the Court, while reiterating his preachments regarding the tolerance claimable by the States under the Fourteenth Amendment[933] he held that methods offensive to human dignity were ruled out by the due process clause."
"Inasmuch as the record of the prisoner's conviction did not controvert the charges that perjured evidence was used, and that favorable evidence was suppressed with the knowledge of the authorities, the case was remanded in order that the prisoner might enjoy that to which he was entitled; namely, a determination of the verity of his allegations."
"The personal presence of the accused, from the beginning to the end of a trial for felony, involving life or liberty, as well as at the time final judgment is rendered against him, may be, and must be assumed to be, vital to the proper conduct of his defence, and cannot be dispensed with."
"[945] Inasmuch as no injury to substantial rights of the defendant was deemed to have been inflicted by his occasional absence during a trial, no denial of due process was declared to have resulted from the acceptance by the State court of the defendant's waiver of his right to be present."
"While regretting that the trial court has not had the testimony read or repeated to the accused, the Supreme Court held that a deaf person is not deprived of due process of law because he had not heard a word of the evidence."
"It also did not overlook the fact the defendant made no objection, asked for nothing, and permitted his counsel to take his own course."
"More recently, the Court, sustained, by only a five-to-four vote, however, a conviction for murder where the trial court rejected the defendant's request that he be present at a view of the scene of the murder to which the jury had been taken."
"In a prosecution for a felony, five Justices declared, the defendant has the privilege under the Fourteenth Amendment to be present in his own person whenever his presence has a relation, reasonably substantial, to the fulness of his opportunity to defend against the charge."
"Employing this standard of appraisal, the majority therefore concluded that no harm or damage had been done to the accused by reason of his failure to be present when the jury viewed the site of the murder."
"In Williams _v._ New York,[950] the Supreme Court rejected the contention that the due process clause requires that a person convicted of murder be permitted to cross-examine probation officers as to his prior criminal record when the trial judge, in the exercise of discretion vested in him by law, considers such information, obtained outside the courtroom, in determining whether to abide by a jury's recommendation of life imprisonment or to impose a death sentence."
"[951] By a similar process of reasoning, in Solesbee _v._ Balkcom,[952] the Court sustained a Georgia statutory procedure granting the governor discretionary authority, with the aid of physicians appointed by himself, to determine, without opportunity for an adversary hearing or for judicial review, whether a condemned convict has become insane and, if so, whether he should be committed to an insane asylum."
"The guaranty of that clause forbids the sentencing of an accused person to prison without a public trial; that is, without a day in court, reasonable notice of the charges, and an opportunity to be heard in one's defense by cross-examining other witnesses, or by summoning witnesses to refute the charges against him."
"* * *[958] However, a conviction before a mayor's court does not become constitutionally defective by reason of the fact that the fixed salary of the mayor is paid out of the fund to which the fines imposed by him contribute."
"[967] On the other hand, a prisoner who, after having been indicted on a charge of receiving stolen goods, abides by the prosecutor's suggestion and pleads guilty to the lesser offense of attempted second degree grand larceny, cannot later contend that a judgment of guilty of the latter offense was lacking in due process in that it amounted to a conviction of a crime for which he had never been indicted."
Under these circumstances he must be deemed to have been given reasonable notice and information of the specific charge against him and a fair hearing in open court.
"Similarly, in Murphy _v._ Massachusetts[976] and Shoener _v._ Pennsylvania[977] the Court held that where the original conviction of the prisoner was, on appeal, construed by the State tribunal to be legally defective and therefore a nullity, a subsequent trial, conviction, and sentence of the accused deprived him of no constitutional right, notwithstanding the fact that under the invalidated original conviction, the defendant had spent time in prison."
[1094] An owner aggrieved by discrimination is entitled to have his assessment reduced to the common level.
"[1103] When State action is attacked under the due process clause, the assailant usually charges also that he is denied the equal protection of the laws."
[1133] A statute providing that no person shall be denied opportunity for employment because he is not a member of a union does not offend the equal protection clause.
In McLaurin _v._ Oklahoma State Regents[1170] the Court held that enforced segregation of a Negro student admitted to a State university was invalid because it handicapped him in the pursuit of effective graduate instruction.
[1193] The action of prison officials in suppressing a prisoner's appeal documents during the statutory period for appeal constitutes a denial of equal protection by refusing him privileges of appeal that were available to others.
"[1206] An accused does not, however, have a legal right to a jury composed in whole or in part of members of his own race."
"In his dissenting opinion in New State Ice Co. _v._ Liebmann, 285 U.S. 202, 302-303 (1932), Justice Brandeis had also observed that: The notion of a distinct category of business 'affected with a public interest' employing property 'devoted to a public use' rests upon historical error."
"[185] Justice McReynolds, speaking for the dissenting Justices, labelled the controls imposed by the challenged statute as a fanciful scheme to protect the farmer against undue exactions by prescribing the price at which milk disposed of by him at will may be resold."
"Dissenting for himself and Justices Black and Rutledge, Justice Douglas declared that, under the authority of Williams _v._ Kaiser, 323 U.S. 471, 476 (1945), if * * * [the] defendant is not capable of making his own defense, it is the duty of the Court, at least in capital cases, to appoint counsel, whether requested so to do or not."
"[847] 333 U.S. 640, 678, 680-682 (1948).--As against the assertion of the majority that the due process clause of the Fourteenth Amendment does not of its own force require appointment of counsel for one simply because he would have a constitutional right to the assistance of counsel in a comparable federal case, the minority, consisting of Justices Black, Murphy, and Rutledge speaking through Justice Douglas, declared that the Bill of Rights is applicable to all courts at all times; for, otherwise, of what value is the constitutional guarantee of a fair trial if an accused does not have counsel to advise and defend him."
"Also when a prisoner's petition for release on the grounds of the unconstitutionally of his conviction has been rejected by a State court, a petition for certiorari addressed to the United States Supreme Court will be denied whenever it appears that the prisoner had not invoked the appropriate State remedy."
The Supreme Court has never entertained a defendant's objections to exclusions from the jury except when he was a member of the excluded class.
"[908] The accused, in his petition, neither denied his guilt nor any of the acts on which his conviction was based."
"The latter affirmed that his testimony at the trial of the petitioner was obtained by deceit, fraud, collusion, and coercion, and was known to the prosecutor to be false."
"However, in a recent civil suit, a United States District Court judge asserted his belief, by way of dictum, that protection against unreasonable searches and seizures, invasion of freedom of speech and press, unlawful and unwarranted incarcerations, arrests, and _failure to allow reasonable bail_ would all be fundamental rights protected by [the Fourteenth] Amendment from State invasion."
"In Solesbee _v._ Balkcom, 339 U.S. 9 (1950), the Court declined to intervene in case coming up from Georgia in which appellant, claiming that he had become insane following conviction and sentence of death, sought a postponement of execution from the governor of the State."
"[986] Thus, where on the day assigned for hearing of a writ of error, it appeared that the accused had escaped from jail, the Court, without denial of due process, could order that the writ be dismissed unless the accused surrender himself within 60 days or be captured.--Allen _v._ Georgia, 166 U.S. 138 (1897)."
"It is a definite handicap to the colored student to confine his association in the Law School with people of his own class, said the opinion of Judge Morris A."
Justice Murphy announced that he favored affirming the conviction and therefore dissented.
"But conceding that a stock dividend represented a gain, the Justice concluded that the only gain taxable as income under the amendment was a gain, a profit, something of exchangeable value _proceeding from_ the property, _severed from_ the capital however invested or employed, and _coming in_, being '_derived_,' that is, _received_ or _drawn by_ the recipient [the taxpayer] for his _separate_ use, benefit, and disposal; * * *."
"Only the latter, in his opinion, answered the description of income derived from property; whereas a gain accruing to capital, not a _growth_ or an _increment_ of value _in_ the investment did not."
"[31] GAINS IN THE FORM OF REAL ESTATE; WHEN TAXABLE AS INCOME When through forfeiture of a lease in 1933, a landlord became possessed of a new building erected on his land by the outgoing tenant, the resulting gain to the former was taxable to him in that year."
"[1] Consistently with this view, federal courts more recently have declared that when local party authorities, acting pursuant to regulations prescribed by a party's State executive committee, refused to permit a Negro, on account of his race, to vote in a primary to select candidates for the office of United States Senator, they deprived him of a right secured to him by the Constitution and laws, in violation of this amendment."
"If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President or Vice President shall have qualified."
"Provision that if the party [i.e., a person stealing property from the United States] has been convicted, then the judgment against him shall be conclusive evidence in the prosecution against [the] receiver that the property of the United States therein described has been embezzled, stolen, or purloined, _held_ to contravene the Sixth Amendment."
"A proviso in section 8 of the Federal Corrupt Practices Act fixing a maximum authorized expenditure by a candidate for Senator in any campaign for his nomination and election, as applied to a primary election, _held_ not supported by article I, section 4, giving Congress power to regulate the manner of holding elections for Senators and Representatives."
"Provisions relating to codes of fair competition, authorized to be approved by the President in his discretion to effectuate the policy of the act, _held_ invalid as a grant of legislative power (_see_ art."
